District of Columbia statutes.
46-305.06

Repealed

Contest by obligor.

Repealed.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 506
as added July 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-131, § 2(i), 45 DCR 2924
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(e)(4), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222
1981 Ed., § 30-345.6.
D.C. Law 16-137, in subsec. (a), substituted “employer in the District by registering the order in a tribunal of the District and filing a contest to that order as provided in subchapter VI of this chapter, or otherwise contesting the order” for “employer in the District”, and deleted “Section 604 applies to the contest.”; in par. (b)(2), substituted “order relating to the obligor” for “order”; and in par. (b)(3), deleted “or agency” following “person” in two places.
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(i) of Uniform Interstate Family Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-94, April 29, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2785).
For temporary addition of section, see § 2(i) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-225, December 23, 1997, 45 DCR 151), and § 2(i) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-310, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1950).
Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Application of Law 12-131: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 46-301.01.

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 506 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).